Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1144
Administration of anesthesia, sedation, or analgesia; limitation.

Nothing in the Dentistry Practice Act shall be construed to allow a dentist to administer to himself or herself, or to any person other than in the course of the practice of dentistry, any drug or agent used for general anesthesia, deep sedation, moderate sedation, minimal sedation, or inhalation analgesia.

Laws 1986, LB 438, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-193.30;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 477;

Laws 2015, LB80, § 14.